Maryland, session 2025, HB0571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–903.
(a) There is a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license.
– 1 –

Ch. 796 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at retail, at a club at the
place described in the license, for on–premises consumption, INCLUDING:
(I) DURING AN EVENT HELD ON THE LICENSED PREMISES; AND
(II) TO A MEMBER OF THE CLUB OR A GUEST OF THE MEMBER.
(2) IF THE LICENSE HOLDER HOSTS AN EVENT FOR AN OUTSIDE
GROUP, THE OUTSIDE GROUP SHALL OBTAIN A CLASS C PER DIEM BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE FROM THE BOARD.
(c) The annual license fee is $480.
11–1006.
(a) There is a Class C (fraternal/sororal) organization license.
(b) The Board may issue the license for use by a local unit of a lodge, political
organization, or chapter of a nonprofit and nationwide fraternal or service organization
that:
(1) is composed only of inducted members;
(2) was operating in the county before the license application was made;
(3) has a membership of at least 100 individuals and dues of at least $5 per
year per individual; and
(4) owns and operates a home or clubhouse that is principally for the use
of its members and guests when accompanied by members.
(c) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at retail for on–premises
consumption, INCLUDING DURING AN EVENT HELD ON THE LICENSED PREMISES, to:
[(1)] (I) a member of the local unit for which the license was issued; or
[(2)] (II) a member’s guest when accompanied by the member.
(2) IF THE LICENSE HOLDER HOSTS AN EVENT FOR AN OUTSIDE
GROUP, THE OUTSIDE GROUP SHALL OBTAIN A CLASS C PER DIEM BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE FROM THE BOARD.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 796
(d) The license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor during the hours and days
as set out for a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license under § 11–2004 of this title.
(e) The annual license fee is $400.
11–1009.
(a) There is a Class C (veterans’ organization) license.
(b) The Board shall issue the license for use by a local unit of a nationwide
nonprofit organization or club that:
(1) is composed only of members who served in the armed forces of the
United States in a war in which the United States has been engaged;
(2) has a charter from a national veterans’ organization that was granted
before the application for the license was made;
(3) has a bona fide membership of at least 100 individuals and dues of at
least $5 per year per individual; and
(4) operates for its members and meets in a clubhouse principally used for
its members.
(c) (1) The SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at retail at the place
described in the license for on–premises consumption, INCLUDING:
(I) DURING AN EVENT HELD ON THE LICENSED PREMISES; AND
(II) TO A MEMBER OF THE VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION OR A
GUEST OF THE MEMBER.
(2) IF THE LICENSE HOLDER HOSTS AN EVENT FOR AN OUTSIDE
GROUP, THE OUTSIDE GROUP SHALL OBTAIN A CLASS C PER DIEM BEER, WINE, AND
LIQUOR LICENSE FROM THE BOARD.
(d) The license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor during the hours and days
as set out for a Class C beer, wine, and liquor license under § 11–2004 of this title.
(e) The annual license fee is $400.
(F) (1) THERE IS AN EVENT PERMIT.
– 3 –

Ch. 796 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (I) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT ONLY TO A HOLDER OF
A CLASS C (VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) LICENSE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(II) AN APPLICANT FOR THE PERMIT SHALL COMPLETE THE
FORM THAT THE BOARD PROVIDES.
(3) THE PERMIT AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER OF A CLASS C
(VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION) LICENSE TO SELL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES THAT ARE
ALLOWED UNDER THE LICENSE:
(I) DURING AN EVENT HELD ON THE LICENSED PREMISES;
(II) TO AN INDIVIDUAL ATTENDING THE EVENT, INCLUDING AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A MEMBER OF THE VETERANS’ ORGANIZATION; AND
(III) FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(4) THE ANNUAL PERMIT FEE IS $100.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –